District of Columbia statutes.
1-614.01

Repealed

Established.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1401, 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 18, 1981, D.C. Law 4-30, § 2, 28 DCR 3118
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(s), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(r), 43 DCR 2978
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 2(b), 45 DCR 745
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(q), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-615.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-344.1.
Applicability of § 101(q) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.